Vermont, session 2025-2026, S320.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS AND INTENT
(a) The First Amendment to the U.S. Constitution and Chapter I, Article 13
of the Vermont Constitution guarantee the fundamental right to freedom of
speech, which includes the right to commercial speech.
VT LEG #385748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.320
2026 Page 2 of 6
(b) The U.S. Supreme Court established a four-part test for determining
whether restrictions on commercial speech are permissible: “(1) whether the
speech at issue concerns lawful activity and is not misleading and (2) whether
the asserted governmental interest is substantial; and, if so, (3) whether the
regulation directly advances the governmental interest asserted and (4) whether
it is not more extensive than is necessary to serve that interest.” Greater New
Orleans Broadcasting Ass’n., Inc. v. United States, 527 U.S. 173 (1999)
(c) Vermont’s existing restrictions on advertising by licensed cannabis
establishments require administrative agency preapproval of all verbal and
written communications to customers, including social media posts and direct
email marketing; operate as a de facto statewide ban on outdoor advertising in
any place accessible by the general public; and restrict the advertisement of
noncannabis goods by licensed cannabis establishments, which are not
applicable to other lawful sellers of those goods.
(d) The State of Vermont has a substantial interest in promoting a vibrant
regulated adult-use cannabis market in which licensed cannabis establishments
are able to displace unregulated sellers of cannabis after more than 80 years of
failed prohibition policies rejected by the State in 2019 Acts and Resolves No.
64.
(e) Accordingly, it is the intent of the General Assembly to amend Title 7
to impose constitutionally permissible restrictions on false or misleading
VT LEG #385748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.320
2026 Page 3 of 6
advertising by licensed cannabis establishments and on advertising that is
designed to be or has the effect of being particularly appealing to minors,
without infringing upon the fundamental speech rights that are protected by
both the U.S. and the Vermont Constitutions.
Sec. 2. 7 V.S.A. § 861 is amended to read:
§ 861. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(2) “Advertisement” means any broadly disseminated written or verbal
statement, illustration, or depiction concerning cannabis or cannabis products
that would reasonably have the effect of inducing sales of cannabis or cannabis
products, including any written, printed, graphic, or other material; billboard,
sign, or other outdoor display; other periodical literature, publication, or in a
radio or television broadcast; the internet; or in any other media. The term
does not include:
* * *
(B) any editorial or other reading material, such as a news release, in
any periodical or publication or newspaper for the publication of which no
money or valuable consideration is paid or promised, directly or indirectly, by
any cannabis establishment, and that is not written by or at the direction of the
licensee;
VT LEG #385748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.320
2026 Page 4 of 6
(C) any educational, instructional, or otherwise noncommercial
material that is not intended to induce sales and that does not propose an
economic transaction, but that merely provides information to the public in an
unbiased manner; or
(D) a sign attached to the premises of a cannabis establishment that
merely identifies the name, location, or operating hours of the cannabis
establishment, and which may include the cannabis establishment’s logo, the
nature of the establishment’s business, and directions to the establishment, but
which does not contain overtly promotional messaging;
(E) any official business directional sign placed by the Agency of
Transportation; or
(F) any statement, illustration, or depiction promoting noncannabis
products sold by a cannabis establishment.
* * *
Sec. 3. 7 V.S.A. § 864 is amended to read:
§ 864. ADVERTISING
* * *
(b) A cannabis establishment advertisement shall not contain any statement
or illustration that:
* * *
VT LEG #385748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.320
2026 Page 5 of 6
(3) represents that the use of cannabis has curative effects treats or cures
a disease;
* * *
(5) offers free samples of cannabis or cannabis products; [Repealed.]
* * *
(c) Cannabis establishments shall not advertise their products via place a
paid advertisement in any third-party medium unless the licensee can show that
not more than 15 30 percent of the audience is reasonably expected to be under
21 years of age.
(d) All advertisements placed in any third-party medium shall contain a
short-form health warnings warning adopted by rule by the Board in
consultation with the Department of Health.
(e) All advertisements shall be submitted to the Board on a form or in a
format prescribed by the Board, prior to the dissemination of the
advertisement. The Board may:
(1) require a specific disclosure be made in the advertisement in a clear
and conspicuous manner if the Board determines that the advertisement would
be false or misleading without such a disclosure; or
(2) In the event of a violation of this section, the Board may require a
cannabis establishment to make changes to its advertisements that are
VT LEG #385748 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.320
2026 Page 6 of 6
necessary to protect the public health, safety, and welfare or consistent with
dispensing information for the product under review.
Sec. 4. 7 V.S.A. § 866 is amended to read:
§ 866. YOUTH
* * *
(d) In accordance with section 864 of this title, advertising by a cannabis
establishment shall not depict a person under 21 years of age consuming
cannabis or cannabis products or be designed to be or have the effect of being
particularly appealing to persons under 21 years of age. Cannabis
establishments shall not advertise their products via place a paid advertisement
in any third-party medium unless the licensee can show that not more than 15
30 percent of the audience is reasonably expected to be under 21 years of age.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385748 v.1